Delaware, session 153, HB127.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4413, Title 24 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4413. The Manufactured Home Installation Board; appointments; composition; qualifications; term; succession; conflicts of interest; public inquiries. (a) The Board shall consist of 9 5 members, appointed by the Governor, who are residents of this State. These members shall consist of: (1) Two manufactured home installers, licensed pursuant to under this chapter; chapter. (2) Two One manufactured home installation inspectors, inspector, certified pursuant to under this chapter; chapter. (3) One representative of Delaware manufactured home retailers; (4) One registered professional engineer with at least 6 years experience in manufactured home planning and design who is authorized to practice in this State; and (5) Three (3) Two members of the public. Section 2. Amend Â§ 4415, Title 24 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4415. The Manufactured Home Installation Board; meetings; officers; quorum. (b) The Board annually shall elect a president, vice-president, secretary, a complaint officer and an education officer. president and vice-president. Each officer shall serve for 1 year and shall not succeed himself or herself for may not serve more than 2 consecutive terms. (c) A majority of the members shall constitute constitutes a quorum for the purpose of transacting business. No disciplinary action shall may be taken without the affirmative vote of at least 5 3 members of the Board.